Tennessee, session 114, HB2404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-7-103(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) The speaker of the senate shall appoint three (3) members as follows:
(A) One (1) member must be a physician licensed under title 63, chapter
6 or 9;
(B) One (1) member must be a pharmacist licensed under title 63,
chapter 10; and
(C) One (1) member must be a specialist in the area of substance abuse
prevention. The speaker shall select the member from a list of three (3) names
submitted by the Prevention Alliance of Tennessee, with the member to be
appointed by the speaker on or after July 1, 2025, in accordance with subsection
(b).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2404
002536
- 1 -